North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 22D. The North Carolina Public Campaign Fund.

§§ 163-278.61 through 163-278.67.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 21.1(a) and Session Laws 2013-381, s. 38.1(a), effective July 1, 2013.

History.
S. 163-278.61; 2002-158, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 23A.1(d); repealed by 2013-360, s. 21.1(a) and 2013-381, s. 38.1(a), effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.62; 2002-158, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 23A.1(d); 2007-510, ss. 1(c), 1(d); 2009-543,
s. 1; 2010-170, s. 12; repealed by 2013-360, s. 21.1(a) and 2013-381, s. 38.1(a), effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.63; 2002-158, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 23A.1 (c), (d); 2006-192, s. 14.1; 2011-266, s. 1.2(b); repealed by 2013-360, s.
21.1(a) and 2013-381, s. 38.1(a), effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.64; 2002-158, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 60; 2005-276, s. 23A.1(d); 2005-430, ss. 4, 5; 2007-510, s. 1(c); 2009-543, ss. 2, 3; repealed by 2013-360, s. 21.1(a) and 2013-381,
s. 38.1(a), effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.64A; 2006-192, s. 10; repealed by 2013-360, s. 21.1(a) and 2013-381, s. 38.1(a), effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.65; 2002-158, s. 1; 2006-192, s. 11; repealed by 2013-360, s. 21.1(a)
and 2013-381, s. 38.1(a), effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.66; 2002-158, s. 1; 2003-278, s. 2; 2006-192, s. 12; 2007-510, s. 1(a), (c); 2008-150, s. 10.2(a); 2009-570, s. 25; repealed by 2013-360, s. 21.1(a) and 2013-381, s. 38.1(a),
effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.67; 2002-158, s. 1; 2007-510, s. 1(b); 2008-150, s. 7(b); 2009-543, ss. 4, 5; 2010-96, s. 36; repealed by 2013-360, s. 21.1(a) and 2013-381, s. 38.1(a), effective July 1, 2013.

§ 163-278.68.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.2(a), effective July 1, 2011.

History.
2002-158, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 23A.1(d); 2006-192, s. 13; 2007-510, s. 1(c); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.2(a), effective July 1, 2011.

§ 163-278.69.
(See Editor’s note for contingent repeal) Voter education.

Judicial Voter Guide. — The State Board shall publish a Judicial Voter Guide that explains the functions of the appellate courts and the laws concerning the election of appellate judges, the purpose and function of the Public Campaign Fund, and the laws
concerning voter registration. The State Board shall distribute the Guide to as many voting-age individuals in the State as practical, through a mailing to all residences or other means it deems effective. The distribution shall
occur no more than 28 days nor fewer than seven days before the one-stop voting period provided in

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6 for the primary and no more than 28 days nor fewer than seven days before the one-stop voting period provided in

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6 for the general election.

Candidate Information. — The Judicial Voter Guide shall include information concerning all candidates for the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals, as provided by those candidates according to a format provided to the candidates by the Board. The State
Board shall request information for the Guide from each candidate according to the following format:

Place of residence.

Education.

Occupation.

Employer.

Date admitted to the bar.

Legal/judicial experience.

Candidate statement. Concerning that statement, the Board shall send to the candidates instructions as follows: “Your statement may include information such as your qualifications, your endorsements, your ratings, why you are seeking judicial office,
why you would make a good judge, what distinguishes you from your opponent(s), your acceptance of spending and fund-raising limits to qualify to receive funds from the Public Campaign Fund, and any other information relevant
to your candidacy. The State Board of Elections will reject any portion of any statement which it determines contains obscene, profane, or defamatory language. The candidate shall have three days to resubmit the candidate
statement if the Board rejects a portion of the statement.The entire entry for a candidate shall be limited to 250 words.

Disclaimer. — The Judicial Voter Guide shall contain the following statement: “Statements by candidates do not express or reflect the opinions of the State Board of Elections.”

History.
2002-158, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 23A.1(d); 2005-430, s. 6; 2006-192, s. 14; 2007-391, s. 4(a); 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2009-543, s. 6; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.4(n); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.70.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 21.1(a) and Session Laws 2013-381, s. 38.1(a), effective July 1, 2013.

History.
2002-158, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 21.1(a) and 2013-381, s. 38.1(a), effective July 1, 2013.

§§ 163-278.71 through 163-278.79.

Reserved for future codification purposes.